New York, session 2025-2026, A8086.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 122-b of the general municipal law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. (a) Each county, in coordination with their regional emergency 4 medical services council, shall convene meetings and a planning process 5 with cities, towns, and villages within their jurisdiction for the 6 purpose of developing and maintaining a comprehensive county emergency 7 medical system plan that shall describe how coordinated and reliable 8 emergency medical services within the county would be provided for all 9 residents within the county. The planning process shall include assess- 10 ment of the existing level of emergency medical services in each area of 11 the county, a plan to increase or provide service where additional 12 service is needed, a determination as to what organizational structure 13 will be utilized to provide service in each area of the county, and cost 14 estimates to provide service in areas requiring service levels greater 15 than currently available. The goal of this process is to provide a 16 framework to assist state and local decision makers in achieving the 17 objective of ensuring that reliable emergency medical services and ambu- 18 lance services are made available to every person in the state. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11722-06-5 A. 8086--A 2 1 (b) In developing the comprehensive county emergency medical system 2 plan, each county, city, town, and village shall work together to speci- 3 fy which entity or entities, and which organizational structure will be 4 utilized for providing emergency medical services and how costs for 5 providing such services will be assigned. Such plan may utilize munici- 6 pal, intermunicipal, not-for-profit or for-profit contract coverage, 7 special district, or regional agreements for providing service in each 8 area of the county. 9 (c) Comprehensive county emergency medical system plans shall be 10 completed within six months of the effective date of this section and 11 submitted to the department of health and the state emergency medical 12 services council for review, and comment. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.